Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-786
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 31-786 to 31-793:

(1) Filing clerk means the election commissioner or county clerk of the county in which all or the largest portion of the land area comprising a sanitary and improvement district is located;

(2) Qualified property owning voter means a person entitled to vote as provided in section 31-735 for all trustees of a sanitary and improvement district other than those which may be elected only by qualified resident voters; and

(3) Qualified resident voter means a person entitled to vote as provided in section 31-735 for all trustees of a sanitary and improvement district.

Laws 1997, LB 874, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 176, § 4.